Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Wild Ginseng Regulation

246.650.
Definitions for KRS 246.660

As used in KRS

246.660

, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Harvest” means to take any part of the ginseng plant while the plant is living; and

“Ginseng” means any part of the American ginseng plant known as Panax quinquefolius.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 415, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 2011, ch. 15, § 1, effective June 8, 2011.

246.655.
Kentucky ginseng fund.

There is hereby established in the State Treasury a separate trust and agency account to be known as the Kentucky ginseng fund to be administered by the Department of Agriculture.

Moneys in this fund shall be used to help administer the ginseng program as provided by KRS

246.660

.

Notwithstanding KRS

45.229

, any moneys remaining in the fund at the close of the fiscal year, including interest, shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the succeeding fiscal year to be used for the purposes set forth in this section.

The fund may receive gifts, grants, federal funds, and any other funds both public and private.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 15, § 3, effective June 8, 2011.

246.660.
Department to administer program for ginseng — Regulations.

The department shall administer a program for ginseng in Kentucky which provides a framework, including a limited harvesting season, in which ginseng shall be eligible for exportation in compliance with federal requirements.

Information relating to the purchase or sale of ginseng that is furnished to or acquired by the department shall constitute proprietary information and not be subject to public disclosure, except to the extent the department deems necessary in any administrative or judicial proceeding involving the administration or enforcement of its administrative regulations.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations to carry out this program and may enter into agreements with any other agency of this state, any other state, or the federal government to carry out this program.

The department shall establish licensing requirements for dealers of ginseng.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations relating to the ginseng program that establish:

A comprehensive set of administrative violations and civil penalties, each not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000); and

The procedure for the suspension or revocation of any license or certificate issued by the department.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 415, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 2011, ch. 15, § 2, effective June 8, 2011.